Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 4. LIABILITY IN TORT

CHAPTER 91B. LIABILITY OF VOLUNTEER VETERINARY PRACTITIONERS

Sec. 91B.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter, "certified veterinary assistant," "licensed veterinary technician," and "veterinarian" have the meanings assigned by Section 801.002, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 827 (H.B. 2850), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 91B.002. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. (a) Except as provided by Section 91B.003, a certified veterinary assistant, licensed veterinary technician, or veterinarian who in good faith and as a volunteer provides veterinary care or treatment to an injured animal is immune from civil liability for an act or omission that occurs in providing that care or treatment if the care or treatment is provided:

(1) in response to an incident that is a man-made or natural disaster that injures, endangers, or threatens to endanger the animal;

(2) at the request of the owner of the animal or an authorized representative of a local, state, or federal agency, including a fire department, a police department, an emergency management agency, or a disaster response agency; and

(3) within the scope of practice authorized and level of supervision required under Chapter 801, Occupations Code.

(b) This section does not apply to a certified veterinary assistant, licensed veterinary technician, or veterinarian giving veterinary care or treatment for or in expectation of compensation from or on behalf of the owner of the animal in excess of reimbursement for expenses incurred.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 827 (H.B. 2850), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 91B.003. APPLICABILITY. This chapter does not apply to an act or omission that is grossly negligent or intentional misconduct.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 827 (H.B. 2850), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.